Maryland, session 2026, HB1542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1542*

HOUSE BILL 1542
21–1114.
(A) A PERSON DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE MAY NOT KNOWINGLY
MANUFACTURE OR SELL, DISTRIBUTE, DISPENSE, OR OTHERWISE SUPPLY A DRUG,
MEDICAL DEVICE, OR OTHER GOOD, SERVICE, OR TECHNOLOGY OR COMPOUND A
DRUG IF THE PERSON KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW THAT THE ORDER,
PRESCRIPTION, OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION FOR THE MANUFACTURE,
COMPOUNDING, OR SUPPLYING OF THE DRUG, MEDICAL DEVICE, OR OTHER GOOD,
SERVICE, OR TECHNOLOGY WAS PROMPTED, EITHER DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, BY
A PERSON SEEKING THE DRUG, MEDICAL DEVICE, OR OTHER GOOD, SERVICE, OR
TECHNOLOGY WITH THE INTENT THAT THE DRUG, MEDICAL DEVICE, OR OTHER
GOOD, SERVICE, OR TECHNOLOGY WILL BE USED TO CARRY OUT A DEATH SENTENCE.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY OF $10,000.
Article – Health Occupations
1–231.
IF AN APPLICANT, LICENSEE, OR CERTIFICATE HOLDER UNDER THIS ARTICLE
VIOLATES OR HAS VIOLATED § 21–1114 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE, A
HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD SHALL:
(1) DENY A LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE TO THE APPLICANT; OR
(2) REVOKE THE LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.